Illinois, session 104th, HB5127.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Alpha-Gal Syndrome Reporting Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds the 7following: 8        (1) Alpha-gal syndrome is a vector-borne disease that 9    is caused by tick bites. 10        (2) Alpha-gal syndrome is characterized by the 11    development of immunoglobulin E antibodies to 12    galactose-alpha-1,3-galactose (alpha-gal), a carbohydrate 13    found in all mammals except some primates. 14        (3) Individuals with alpha-gal syndrome may experience 15    allergic reactions after being exposed to mammalian meat 16    and other mammal-derived products and products with 17    ingredients derived from mammals, including foods, drugs, 18    and other products. Farmers and ranchers may also react to 19    livestock exposures. 20        (4) Alpha-gal syndrome is an unusually severe allergy 21    that is often life-altering and sometimes fatal. 22        (5) Data previously shared by the Centers for Disease 23    Control and Prevention showed that approximately 90% of   HB5127- 2 -LRB104 19510 BDA 32958 b1    persons with a positive test result had clinical symptoms 2    consistent with alpha-gal syndrome and that they were 3    classified as having confirmed alpha-gal syndrome. 4        (6) The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention has 5    identified alpha-gal syndrome as an emerging public health 6    concern and has identified state-level surveillance of 7    alpha-gal syndrome as a public health need. 8        (7) The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention has 9    identified Illinois as a state with one of the highest 10    estimated prevalences of alpha-gal syndrome in the United 11    States. 12    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 13    "Alpha-gal syndrome" means an acquired allergic condition 14and vector-borne disease caused by tick bites in which an 15individual develops immunoglobulin E, antibodies to 16galactose-alpha-1,3-galactose (alpha-gal), resulting in 17allergic reactions after exposure to mammalian meat, other 18products derived from mammals, and products containing 19mammal-derived ingredients or carrageenan. 20    "Clinical laboratory" or "laboratory" means a facility 21that performs laboratory tests or issues reports resulting 22from such tests and that is certified under the Clinical 23Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988.24    "Confirmed alpha-gal syndrome case" means a person who 25meets the clinical criteria or case surveillance definition   HB5127- 3 -LRB104 19510 BDA 32958 b1for alpha-gal syndrome and has confirmatory laboratory 2evidence (serum or plasma immunoglobulin E to alpha-gal of at 3least 0.1 international unit per milliliter or 0.1 kU/L).4    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.5    "Diagnosed" means identified as having alpha-gal syndrome, 6either clinically or with laboratory testing confirmation, by: 7        (1) a physician licensed to practice medicine in all 8    its branches; 9        (2) a person otherwise permitted to diagnose alpha-gal 10    syndrome by applicable laws; or 11        (3) another appropriately licensed person under the 12    supervision of or in collaboration with a physician 13    licensed to practice medicine in all its branches. 14    "Electronic laboratory reporting" or "ELR" means the 15automated electronic transmission of laboratory test results 16from a laboratory to the Department or a local health 17department for reportable conditions, using nationally 18recognized electronic standards.19    "Medical reporters" includes medical professionals and 20persons described in 77 Ill. Adm. Code 690.200(a)(1) or 21successor rules as reporting entities or their equivalent.22    "Negative alpha-gal syndrome case" means a person who is 23considered not to have alpha-gal syndrome based on an 24alpha-gal immunoglobulin E test result of less than 0.1 kU/L 25(serum or plasma immunoglobulin E to alpha-gal of less than 260.1 international unit per milliliter or 0.1 kU/L).  HB5127- 4 -LRB104 19510 BDA 32958 b1    "Positive alpha-gal immunoglobulin E test result" means an 2alpha-gal immunoglobulin E test result of at least 0.1 kU/L 3(serum or plasma immunoglobulin E to alpha-gal of at least 0.1 4international unit per milliliter or 0.1 kU/L). 5    "Suspected alpha-gal syndrome case" means a person who had 6confirmatory laboratory evidence with no clinical information 7available.  8    Section 15. Mandatory reporting by medical reporters; 9counties and statewide.10    (a) The Department shall adopt rules to track cases of 11alpha-gal syndrome within counties and statewide. 12    (b) Medical reporters shall report diagnosed cases of 13alpha-gal syndrome to the Department in the manner and 14timeframes prescribed for reportable conditions under the 15Control of Notifiable Diseases and Conditions Code (77 Ill. 16Adm. Code 690).17    (c) Reporting and tracking of cases of alpha-gal syndrome 18under this Section shall be independent from or concurrent 19with any reporting or tracking conducted by the federal 20government or any federal agency. 21    (d) The Department has the duty to independently track 22cases of alpha-gal syndrome in this State in consultation and 23coordination with federal agencies, including the Centers for 24Disease Control and Prevention.   HB5127- 5 -LRB104 19510 BDA 32958 b1    Section 20. Laboratory reporting 2    (a) The Department shall adopt rules requiring a report of 3alpha-gal syndrome for an alpha-gal immunoglobulin E level of 40.1 kU/L. 5    (b) A laboratory that finalizes a test result as described 6under subsection (a) shall report the test result to the 7Department as a suspected case of alpha-gal syndrome through 8an electronic laboratory reporting system. 9    (c) The Department shall follow up on reported suspected 10cases of alpha-gal syndrome by applying an appropriate random 11sampling method for confirmation that the cases meet the most 12current Centers for Disease Control and Prevention 13surveillance case definition of alpha-gal syndrome. 14    Section 25. Reporting to the Centers for Disease Control 15and Prevention. The Department shall submit an annual report 16to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention summarizing 17its findings related to the reporting and incidence of both 18suspected and confirmed cases of alpha-gal syndrome.  19    Section 30. Publication of tracking results.20    (a) The Department shall publish the results of the 21tracking of cases of alpha-gal syndrome publicly on the 22Department's website in a timely manner. 23    (b) Published alpha-gal syndrome data shall include, but 24not be limited to:   HB5127- 6 -LRB104 19510 BDA 32958 b1        (1) suspected cases;2        (2) confirmed cases; and 3        (3) an estimate of likely cases based on either State 4    data gathered from random sampling or data previously 5    shared by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention 6    that showed that approximately 90% of persons with a 7    positive test result had clinical symptoms consistent with 8    alpha-gal syndrome and that they were classified as having 9    confirmed alpha-gal syndrome.10    (c) The Department shall not disclose or publish 11information under this Section that is confidential or is 12prohibited by law to disclose.